Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 2

Guardianship Generally

34-2-101. Actions for appointment of guardian — Where brought.

Actions for the appointment of only a guardian of the person may be brought in the juvenile court in the county in which there is venue. Actions for the appointment of a guardian of the person or property or both may be brought in a court exercising probate jurisdiction or any other court of record in the county in which there is venue.

An action for the appointment of a guardian may be brought in the county of residence of the minor, the county of residence of the minor's parents or, if the minor's parents are living apart, the county of residence of the custodial parent.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 34; T.C.A. §34-12-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§34-2-101 —34-2-115,34-2-201 —34-2-206 (Code 1858, § 2489 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 115), § 2491 (deriv Acts 1823, ch. 2, § 1), § 2492 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 2), § 2493 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 5), § 2494 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 5; 1847-1848, ch. 167), § 2495 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 14, §§ 1, 3; 1845-1846, ch. 190), § 2496 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 190), §§ 2497, 2498 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 14, §§ 2, 4); §§ 2499-2501 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 117, §§ 1, 3), §§ 2502-2504 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2, 4); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 90, §§ 4-6; Shan., §§ 4250, 4252-4255, § 4258-4270; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8467-8471, 8474-8488; Acts 1951, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 8476, 8476.1); 1953, ch. 156, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 612, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 34-301 — 34-306; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; Acts 1982, ch. 853, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 34-201 — 34-216; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 21; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 181, § 3., concerning guardians generally and testamentary guardians, were repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 33, effective January 1, 1993.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 51 provided that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a corporation, partnership, association, or other business entity to be appointed as a fiduciary unless such corporation, partnership, association or other business entity is otherwise authorized by law to exercise such authority.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 52 provided that for each existing guardian or conservator, this chapter shall be effective for any act required to be done by the fiduciary and due on or after January 1, 1993; and that each existing limited guardian shall become a guardian or conservator as the case may be, with limited powers on January 1, 1993.

Cross-References. Restrictions on appointment of nonresident guardian, §35-50-107.

Rule Reference. This part is referred to in Rule 2 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 78, 1039.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-503, 4-505, 4-506.

Law Reviews.

Changes in Tennessee's Guardianship and Conservatorship Statute (Mary D. Colley and Colleen P. Mac Lean), 29 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1993).

Survey of the New Tennessee Guardianship and Conservatorship Act, 60 Tenn. L. Rev. (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Guardianships for undocumented alien minors. OAG 14-84, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 87 (9/16/14).

34-2-102. Petition for appointment of guardian — Who may file.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any person having knowledge of the circumstances necessitating the appointment of a guardian.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 35; T.C.A. §34-12-102.

34-2-103. Priority of persons to be considered.

Subject to the court's determination of what is in the best interests of the minor, the court shall consider the following persons in the order listed for appointment of the guardian:

The parent or parents of the minor;

The person or persons designated by the parent or parents in a will or other written document;

Adult siblings of the minor;

Closest relative or relatives of the minor; and

Other person or persons.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 36; T.C.A. §34-12-103.

34-2-104. Petition for appointment — Sworn — Contents.

The petition for the appointment of a guardian, which shall be sworn, should contain the following:

The name, date of birth, residence and mailing address of the minor;

The name, age, residence and mailing address and relationship of the petitioner;

The name, age, mailing address and relationship of the proposed guardian and, if the proposed guardian is other than the petitioner, a statement signed by the proposed guardian acknowledging awareness of the petition and willingness to serve;

The name, mailing address and relationship of the closest relative or relatives of the minor and the name and mailing address of the present custodian of the minor who should be notified of the proceedings. If the respondent has no then living parent or sibling, the petition shall so state and more remote relatives are not to be listed;

An explanation of the reason for seeking appointment of a guardian; and

If the petition requests the guardian manage the property of the respondent, the petition also shall contain:

If the financial information about the minor is known to the petitioner:

A list of the property of the minor together with the approximate fair market value of each item. The petitioner shall state whether the property listed is all of the minor's property;

A list of the source, amount and frequency of each item of income, pension, social security benefit or other revenue received by the minor;

A list of the usual monthly expenses of the minor. The petitioner shall include an explanation of how these expenditures were met prior to the filing of the petition; and

A description of the proposed plan for the management of the minor's property if a guardian is appointed; or

If the financial information about the minor is unknown to the petitioner, a request that the court enter an order authorizing the petitioner to investigate the respondent's property.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 37; T.C.A. §34-12-104; Acts 2003, ch. 35, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).

34-2-105. Where guardian needed — Court order.

If the court determines a guardian is needed, the court shall enter an order which shall:

Name the guardian or guardians;

If the guardian is to manage the property of the minor, then:

Set the amount of the guardian's bond unless waived as authorized in § 34-1-105;

Set forth the nature and frequency of each approved expenditure and prohibit the guardian from making other expenditures without court approval;

Set forth the approved management of the minor's property; and

Prohibit the sale of any property except as permitted by § 34-1-116 without court approval or as permitted in the property management plan approved by such order; and

State any other authority or direction as the court determines is appropriate to properly care for the person and property of the minor.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 38; T.C.A. §34-12-105.

34-2-106. Minor attaining eighteen (18) years of age — Termination or continuation of guardianship.

Except as provided in subsection (c), when the minor for whom a guardian of the person is serving reaches the age of eighteen (18) years of age, the guardianship of the person of the minor shall terminate.

When the minor for whom a guardian of the estate of the minor is serving reaches eighteen (18) years of age, the guardianship shall terminate.

Any interested person, including, but not limited to, the guardian of the estate of the minor, may, not more than ninety (90) days before the minor reaches eighteen (18) years of age and not later than the filing of the preliminary final accounting, petition the court to continue the guardianship for a period of time not to extend beyond the person's twenty-fifth birthday. A copy of the petition shall be served on the minor or it must be shown that the minor has actual notice of the filing of the petition.

The burden of demonstrating why the guardianship of the estate of such person should continue shall be on the person seeking the continuation of the guardianship. In determining whether to terminate the guardianship, the court shall consider whether the termination is in the best interest of the person, and the court shall consider the ability of the person to wisely manage and control the property irrespective of whether special needs exist. If the court so finds, the court shall continue the guardianship for a longer period of time not to extend beyond the person's twenty-fifth birthday. The court may permit either the payment of a portion of the estate or the establishment of a distribution schedule upon request of any party. If the court does not continue the guardianship, in the discretion of the court the minor may receive attorneys' fees from the person petitioning the court for continuation of the guardianship.

Within sixty (60) days after the guardianship of the estate of the person terminates, the guardian shall file a preliminary final accounting with the court, which shall account for all assets, receipts and disbursements from the date of the last accounting until the date the guardianship of the estate terminates, and shall detail the amount of the final distribution to close the guardianship of the estate of the person. If no objections have been filed to the clerk's report on the preliminary final accounting within thirty (30) days from the date the clerk's report is filed, the guardian shall distribute the remaining assets. The receipts and final cancelled checks evidencing the final distribution shall be filed with the court by the guardian. When the evidence of the final distribution is filed with the court, and on order of the court, the guardianship proceeding for the estate of the person shall be closed. A final accounting may not be waived by the minor for whom the guardian of an estate is serving regardless of the age of the minor.

If a minor for whom a guardian of the person or estate is serving has previously been determined to be a disabled person, when the minor reaches eighteen (18) years of age, the guardian shall automatically continue as conservator. If the guardian is the department of children's services, this subsection (c) shall not apply.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 39; 1994, ch. 855, § 13; 1996, ch. 1015, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 67; T.C.A. §34-12-106.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Cross-References. Receipt for legacy or share, §30-2-707.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), § 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).